North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-26 Seed Potato Act [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5]

4-26-01.
Title. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-03.
Seed potato control area — Formation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-04.
Petition for formation of an area. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-05.
Power of seed commissioner in formation of area. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-06.
Formation of a committee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-07.
Powers and duties of the committee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-08.
Regulations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-08.1.
Administrative procedure and judicial review. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-09.
Restrictions pertaining to quality of seed planted or grown. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-10.
Sale of potatoes produced in area. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-11.
Dissolution of control area and of committee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-26-12.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.